District of Columbia statutes.
42-3403.07

Repealed

Housing Assistance Fund.

Repealed.

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 307, 27 DCR 2975
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-196, § 2, 30 DCR 57
Nov. 5, 1983, D.C. Law 5-38, § 2(g), 30 DCR 4866
Sept. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-154, § 2(c), 35 DCR 5715
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 2082, 51 DCR 8441
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33,§ 2070, 52 DCR 7503
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 5(l), 53 DCR 6794
Oct. 1, 2007, D.C. Law 16-181, § 3, 53 DCR 6703
Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 2002, 54 DCR 7052
Mar. 21, 2009, D.C. Law 17-319, § 3(b), 56 DCR 214
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2111(b), 57 DCR 181
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9032, 58 DCR 6226
1981 Ed., § 45-1626.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of Rental Housing Conversion and Sale Act of 1980 Temporary Extension Amendment Act of 1988 (D.C. Law 7-140, September 21, 2008, law notification 35 DCR 7279).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of Abatement of Nuisance Properties and Tenant Receivership Temporary amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Law 17-237, October 21, 2008, law notification 55 DCR 11700).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2082 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2082 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2070 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2002, of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
For temporary (90 day) amendment, see § 3(b) of Abatement of Nuisance Properties and Tenant Receivership Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-420, July 8, 2008, 55 DCR 7703).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of Abatement of Nuisance Properties and Tenant Receivership Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-563, October 27, 2008, 55 DCR 12019).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2111(b) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2111(b) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).

Short title of subtitle G of title II of Law 15-205: Section 2081 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided that subtitle G of title II of the act may be cited as the Housing Assistance Fund Amendment Act of 2004.

Short title: Section 2001 of D.C. Law 17-20 provided that subtitle A of title II of the act may be cited as the “Rental Housing Operations Transfer Amendment Act of 2007”.

Section 5 of D.C. Law 16-181 provided: “Section 2 through 4 shall apply as of October 1, 2007.”
Section 104 of D.C. Law 19-171, § 104 made a technical correction to D.C. Law 19-21 which did not affect the repeal of this section.